Massachusetts, session 194th, S2679.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 5-3-1 and 5-3-2 of the charter
of the town of Plymouth, or of any other general or special law to the contrary, all acts and
proceedings of the representative town meeting of the town of Plymouth held since March 18,
2020, and all actions and proceedings in reliance thereon, are hereby ratified, validated and
confirmed, notwithstanding that some members of the representative town meeting were not
sworn in within 30 days of their election; and, provided further, any representative town meeting
member serving as of the effective date of this act who was not sworn in within 30 days of their
election may continue to serve in such position until the expiration of their current elected term
or their sooner removal, retirement, or resignation.
of 2

SECTION 2. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 1 of chapter 123 of the bylaws of
the town of Plymouth, or of any other general or special law to the contrary, all acts and actions
taken by all elected and appointed officials since April 11, 2015, and all actions and proceedings
taken in reliance thereon, are hereby ratified, validated and confirmed notwithstanding that some
elected and appointed officials were not sworn in within 30 days of their election; and provided
further, any appointed official serving as of the effective date of this act who was not sworn in
within 30 days of their appointment may continue to serve in such position until the expiration of
their current appointed term or their sooner removal, retirement or resignation.
of 2